Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. County Auditor

§ 261.
County financial audit.

Biennially, all of the accounts of the county treasurer, including any reserve funds, shall be subject to a financial audit conducted according to the generally accepted government accounting standards as established by the federal government accounting office. The audit shall be performed by a public accountant regulated under Title 26 and shall be conducted within four months after the close of the fiscal year being audited. The accountant’s report shall be accompanied by a management letter containing findings and recommendations.

The assistant judges shall enter into a contract with a public accountant to perform the audits required by this section. The assistant judges may enter into a multiple year contract under this section, provided that the person to whom a contract is awarded is selected by use of an open request for proposals process.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 262.
Repealed. 1997, No. 107 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999, pursuant to 1997.